Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-21] Admissibility of evidence;
testimony by a child. (a) Any statement relating to an allegation of
imminent harm, harm, or threatened harm that a child has made to any person shall
be admissible as evidence.

(b) In deciding in temporary foster custody
hearings whether there is reasonable cause to believe that a child is subject
to imminent harm the court may consider relevant hearsay evidence when direct
testimony is unavailable or when it is impractical to subpoena witnesses who
will be able to testify to facts based on personal knowledge.

(c) A child's recorded statement shall be
admissible in evidence in any proceeding under this chapter; provided that:

(1) The statement is recorded on film, audiotape, or
videotape, or by other reliable electronic means;

(2) The recording equipment used is capable of
producing an accurate recording, was operated by a competent person, and the
recording is accurate and has not been altered; and

(3) Every person on the recording is identified.

(d) A child may be directed by the court to
testify under circumstances deemed by the court to be in the best interests of
the child and the furtherance of justice. These circumstances may include an
on-the-record interview of the child in chambers, with only those parties
present during the interview as the court deems to be in the best interests of
the child. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next